Utah statutes.
72-6-103.   Plans, specifications, and estimates for culverts, bridges, and road construction.

The department shall furnish plans, specifications, and estimates for culverts, bridges, road construction, and other related information desired by local highway authorities for use on county roads and city streets on terms mutually agreed upon.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

